en: natural lime flavouring
de: natürliches Limettenaroma
es: Saborizante de limón natural
fi: luontainen limettiaromi, luontainen limearomi
fr: arôme naturel de citron vert
hr: prirodna aroma limeta
hu: természetes lime aroma
it: aroma naturale di lime
nl: natuurlijk limoen aroma, natuurlijk aroma van limoen
pl: naturalny aromat limonki
sv: naturlig limearom

fr: arôme naturel de citron-citron vert
hr: prirodna aroma limuna i limeta
nl: natuurlijke citroen en limoen aromas

fr: arôme naturel de citron vert avec autres arômes naturels
pl: naturalny aromat limonki z innymi naturalnymi aromatami

en: grapefruit flavouring
de: Grapefruitgeschmack
fi: greippiaromi
fr: arôme de pamplemousse
hr: aroma grejpa
hu: grépfrút aroma, grapefruit aroma
it: aroma di pompelmo
nl: grapefruitaroma
pl: aromat grejpfrutowy
pt: aroma de toranja
ru: грейпфрутовый аромат

en: grapefruit natural flavouring
de: Natürlicher Grapefruitgeschmack
fi: luontainen greippiaromi
fr: arôme naturel de pamplemousse
hr: prirodna aroma grejpa
hu: természetes grépfrút aroma
it: aroma naturale di pompelmo
pl: naturalny aromat grejpfrutowy

en: pink grapefruit natural flavouring
de: natürliches Pink Grapefruitaroma
fr: arôme naturel de pamplemousse rose
hr: prirodna aroma ružičastog grejpa
it: aroma naturale di pompelmo rosa
pl: naturalny aromat różowego grejpfruta

en: natural mandarin orange flavour
de: natürlches Mandarinenaroma, natürliches Mandarinen-Aroma
fi: luontainen mandariiniaromi
fr: arôme naturel de mandarine
hr: prirodna aroma mandarine
hu: természetes mandarin aroma
it: aroma naturale di mandarino
nl: natuurlijk mandarijnaroma
pl: naturalny aromat mandarynkowy, naturalny aromat mandarynki

en: natural cherry flavouring
bg: натурален аромат на череша
de: natürliches Kirscharoma
es: sabor natural cereza, sabor natural a cereza
fi: luontainen kirsikka-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de cerise
hr: prirodna aroma višnje, prirodna aroma trešnje
hu: természetes cseresznye aroma
it: aroma naturale di ciliegia
pl: naturalny aromat wiśniowy

en: natural hot pepper flavouring
de: natürliches Chiliaroma, natürliches Chili-Aroma
fi: luontainen chiliaromi
fr: arôme naturel de piment
hr: prirodna aroma ljute papričice
it: aroma naturale di peperoncino piccante

en: natural blueberry flavouring
de: natürliches Heidelbeeraroma, natürliches Heidelbeer-Aroma, natürliches Blaubeeraroma, natürliches Blaubeer-Aroma
es: aroma natural de arándano
fi: luontainen mustikka-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de myrtille
hr: prirodna aroma borovnice
hu: természetes áfonya aroma
it: aroma naturale di mirtillo

en: natural poultry flavouring
de: natürliches Geflügelaroma, natürliches Geflügel-Aroma
fr: arôme naturel de volaille
hr: prirodna aroma peradi
hu: természetes baromfi aroma
it: aroma naturale di pollame

en: natural ginger flavouring
de: natürliches Ingweraroma, natürliches Ingwer-Aroma
es: aroma natural de jengibre
fi: luontainen inkivääriaromi
fr: arôme naturel de gingembre
hr: prirodna aroma đumbira
hu: természetes gyömbér aroma
it: aroma naturale di zenzero
pl: naturalny aromat imbirowy

en: pineapple flavouring, ananas flavouring
bg: ананасов аромат
da: ananasaroma
de: Ananasaroma
es: aroma de piña
fi: ananasaromi
fr: arôme d'ananas
hr: aroma ananasa
hu: ananász aroma
it: Aroma di ananas
nb: ananasarom
nl: ananasaroma
pl: aromat ananasowy
pt: sabor de abacaxi
ro: aromă de ananas
sv: ananasarom

en: natural pineapple aroma
da: naturlig ananasaroma
de: natürliches Ananas-Aroma
fi: luonnollinen ananasaromi
fr: arôme naturel de ananas
nb: naturlig ananasarom
sv: naturlig ananasarom

en: banana flavouring
de: Bananengeschmack, Bananenaroma, Bananen-Aroma
es: aroma de plátano, aroma de banana
fi: banaaniaromi
fr: arôme de banane
hr: aroma banane
hu: banán aroma, banánaroma
it: aroma di banana
nl: bananensmaak
pl: aromat bananowy
ro: aromă de banane

en: natural banana flavouring
de: natürliches Bananenaroma
es: aroma natural de plátano
fi: luontainen banaaniaromi
fr: arôme naturel de banane
hr: prirodna aroma banane
hu: természetes banán aroma
it: Aroma naturale alla banana
nl: natuurlijke bananensmaak
pl: naturalny aromat bananowy

en: natural cola flavouring
de: natürliches Cola-Aroma, natürliches Colaaroma
es: sabor natural de cola
fi: luontainen kola-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de cola
hr: prirodna cola aroma
hu: természetes kóla aroma
it: aroma naturale di cola
nl: natuurlijke cola-smaak
ro: aromă naturală de cola

en: chocolate flavouring
de: Schokoladengeschmack
es: saborizante a chocolate
fi: suklaa-aromi
fr: arôme de chocolat
hr: aroma čokolade
hu: csokoládé aroma
it: aroma di cioccolato
nl: chocoladesmaak
pl: aromat czekolady, aromat czekoladowy
ro: aromă de ciocolată

en: elderberry flavouring
bg: аромат на бъз
de: Holunderaroma, Holunder-Aroma
fr: arôme de sureau
hr: bazgine bobice, aroma cvijeta bazge
hu: bodza aroma
it: aroma di sambuco

en: ketchup flavouring
bg: кетчуп аромат
cs: chuť kečupu
da: ketchupsmag
de: Ketchup-Aroma
el: αρωματική ύφεση κέτσαπ
es: aroma de ketchup
et: ketsupiaroom
fi: ketsuppiaromi, ketsuppimaku
fr: arôme de ketchup
hr: aroma kečapa, okus kečapa
hu: ketchup aroma, ketchup íz
it: aroma di ketchup, sapore di ketchup
lt: ketchup skonis
lv: ketchup garša
nl: ketchuparoma, ketchupsmaak
pl: smak ketchupu
pt: sabor de ketchup
ro: aromă de ketchup, gust de ketchup
sk: chuť kečupu
sl: ketchup okus
sv: ketchupsmak
tr: ketçap aroması
uk: смак кетчупу